Hawaii statutes.
§661-2 Judgment against claimant when.
Upon the trial of any cause in which any counterclaim or other demand is set up
on the part of the State against any person making claim against the State, the
court shall, without the intervention of a jury, hear and determine the claim
or demand both for and against the State and claimant; and if upon the whole
case it finds that the claimant is indebted to the State, it shall render
judgment to that effect. [L 1894-5, c 26, §2; RL 1925, §2670; am L 1929, c 213,
§2; RL 1935, §4421; RL 1945, §10476; RL 1955, §245-2; HRS §661-2; am L 1972, c
164, §1(b)]

Cross References

Costs, bond, when State a party, see §607-24.

Money paid under protest, suit to recover, see §40-35.

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next